Vermont, session 2025-2026, H285.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. MOTOR VEHICLE INSPECTION AFFORDABILITY; STUDY
COMMITTEE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Motor Vehicle Inspection Affordability
Study Committee to identify opportunities to make motor vehicle inspections
more affordable without negatively impacting the safety of motor vehicles on
Vermont’s highways.
(b) Membership. The Committee shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Treasurer or designee;
VT LEG #380449 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.285
2025 Page 2 of 3
(2) the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles or designee;
(3) a member, appointed by the Vermont Insurance Agents Association;
(4) a member, appointed by Vermont Vehicle and Automotive
Distributors Association; and
(5) a member representing the Vermont community action agencies,
appointed by the Vermont Community Action Partnership.
(c) Powers and duties. The Committee shall study potential opportunities
to make motor vehicle inspections more affordable without negatively
impacting the safety of motor vehicles on Vermont’s highways, including the
following issues:
(1) the average repair costs for vehicles that fail inspection;
(2) potential opportunities to reduce the cost of repairs needed to enable
a motor vehicle that failed inspection to pass inspection;
(3) opportunities to assist Vermont residents with lower income with the
cost of inspections and repairs necessary to enable a motor vehicle to pass
inspection; and
(4) the potential administrative, financial, and safety impacts of
requiring that motor vehicles be inspected every two years instead of annually.
(d) Assistance. The Committee shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Office of the Treasurer and the technical and legal
assistance of the Department of Motor Vehicles.
VT LEG #380449 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.285
2025 Page 3 of 3
(e) Report. On or before December 30, 2025, the Committee shall submit a
written report to the House and Senate Committees on Transportation with its
findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Treasurer or designee shall call the first meeting of the
Committee to occur on or before September 1, 2025.
(2) The Treasurer or designee shall be the chair.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Committee shall cease to exist on January 30, 2026.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Committee who
are not otherwise compensated for their attendance at meetings shall be entitled
to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under
32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than four meetings. These payments shall be
made from monies appropriated to the Office of the Treasurer.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380449 v.2